North Carolina, session 2025, SB598.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-105.37(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Identification of Low-Performing Schools. – The State Board of Education shall
identify low-performing schools on an annual basis. Low-performing schools are those that earn
an overall school performance grade of D or F and a school growth score of "met expected
growth" or "not met expected growth" as defined by G.S. 115C-83.15."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-105.37(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Parental Notice of Low-Performing School Status. – Each school that the State Board
identifies as low-performing shall provide written notification to the parents and guardians of
students attending that school within 30 days of the identification that includes the following
information:
(1) A statement that the State Board of Education has found that the school has
earned an overall school performance grade of D or F and a school growth
score of "met expected growth" or "not met expected growth" and has been
identified as a low-performing school as defined by G.S. 115C-105.37. The
statement shall include an explanation of the school performance grades and
growth scores.
…."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to identification
of low performing schools based on data from the 2025-2026 school year.
*S598-v-1*